Colorado, session 2026A, SB078.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-322, add (3.5) as
follows:
2-2-322. Fiscal notes - definitions - repeal.
(3.5) (a) FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT SUBMIT
POTENTIAL LEGISLATIVE FISCAL IMPACTS TO THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION, THE
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL GRANT THE SUBMITTING
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION ACCESS TO THE OFFICIAL RESPONSES OF
THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND EACH SUBMITTING
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AT THE TIME THAT THE FISCAL IMPACT
INFORMATION IS SUBMITTED TO THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL FOR
CONSIDERATION.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3.5):
(I) "DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT
OF HIGHER EDUCATION CREATED IN SECTION 24-1-114.
(II) "INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS:
(A) A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 23-18-102 (10);
(B) A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-71-102
(1)(a);
(C) AN AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-60-103 (1); AND
(D) THE AURARIA HIGHER EDUCATION CENTER CREATED IN ARTICLE
70 OF TITLE 23.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-115-103, amend
(10) as follows:
12-115-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 115, unless the context otherwise requires:
(10) "Qualified state institution of higher education" means:
(a) One of the state institutions of higher education established
under, specified in, and located upon the campuses described in sections
23-20-101 (1)(a), 23-20-101 (1)(d), and 23-31-101, limited to the buildings
owned or leased by those institutions on the campuses; AND
(b) The institution whose campus is established under and specified
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-078

in section 23-20-101 (1)(b); but limited to EXCEPT THAT, FOR BUILDINGS
LOCATED WITHIN THE GROUNDS OF THE AURARIA HIGHER EDUCATION
CENTER CREATED IN ARTICLE 70 OF TITLE 23, "QUALIFIED STATE INSTITUTION
OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS ONLY THOSE BUILDINGS THAT ARE
CONSTRUCTED OR WHOLLY RENOVATED FROM MONEY HELD BY THE
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO AT DENVER AND THAT ARE CURRENTLY OWNED,
OPERATED, AND MAINTAINED BY THE UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO AT
DENVER, INCLUDING the buildings located in Denver at 1380 Lawrence
street, 1250 Fourteenth street, and 1475 Lawrence street; and 1191 LARIMER
STREET, 1201 LARIMER STREET, AND 1355 TWELFTH STREET.
(c) The institution whose campus is established under and specified
in section 23-20-101 (1)(d), but limited to current and future buildings
owned, leased, or built on land owned on or before January 1, 2015, by the
university of Colorado on the campus described in section 23-20-101 (1)(d).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-155-103, amend
(12) as follows:
12-155-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 155, unless the context otherwise requires:
(12) "Qualified state institution of higher education" means:
(a) One of the state institutions of higher education established
under, specified in, and located upon the campuses described in sections
23-20-101 (1)(a), 23-20-101 (1)(d), and 23-31-101, limited to the buildings
owned or leased by those institutions on those campuses; AND
(b) The institution whose campus is established under and specified
in section 23-20-101 (1)(b); but limited to EXCEPT THAT, FOR BUILDINGS
LOCATED WITHIN THE GROUNDS OF THE AURARIA HIGHER EDUCATION
CENTER CREATED IN ARTICLE 70 OF TITLE 23, "QUALIFIED STATE INSTITUTION
OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS ONLY THOSE BUILDINGS THAT ARE
CONSTRUCTED OR WHOLLY RENOVATED FROM MONEY HELD BY THE
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO AT DENVER AND THAT ARE CURRENTLY OWNED,
OPERATED, AND MAINTAINED BY THE UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO AT
DENVER, INCLUDING the buildings located in Denver at 1380 Lawrence
street, 1250 Fourteenth street, and 1475 Lawrence street; and 1191 LARIMER
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-078

STREET, 1201 LARIMER STREET, AND 1355 TWELFTH STREET.
(c) The institution whose campus is established under and specified
in section 23-20-101 (1)(d), but limited to current and future buildings
owned or leased or built on land owned on or before January 1, 2015, by the
university of Colorado on the campus described in section 23-20-101 (1)(d).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-101.1, add (1.5)
as follows:
23-1-101.1. Definitions.
As used in this article 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) "DATA ADVISORY GROUP" MEANS THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP
CREATED IN SECTION 23-1-145.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-103, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(b) as follows:
23-1-103. Advisory committee to the Colorado commission on
higher education.
(1) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the
commission for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and
needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly
and the governing boards for state-supported institutions of higher
education. The advisory committee shall consist CONSISTS of not less than
thirteen FOURTEEN members, to be designated as follows:
(b) One member shall be selected and designated by The
commission SHALL SELECT AND DESIGNATE:
(I) ONE MEMBER to represent the faculty in the state; and
(II) One member shall be selected and designated by the commission
to represent the students in the state;
(III) On and after August 5, 2009, the commission shall select and
designate one member who, at the time of designation, is a parent of a
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-078

student who is enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher education
in Colorado to represent the parents of students; AND
(IV) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2026, ONE MEMBER WHO IS A CURRENT
MEMBER OF THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP AND WHO WORKS AT A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-103, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(b) as follows:
23-1-103. Advisory committee to the Colorado commission on
higher education.
(1) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the
commission for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and
needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly
and the governing boards for state-supported institutions of higher
education. The advisory committee shall consist CONSISTS of not less than
thirteen members, to be designated as follows:
(b) One member shall be selected and designated by The
commission SHALL SELECT AND DESIGNATE:
(I) ONE MEMBER to represent the faculty in the state; and one
member shall be selected and designated by the commission to represent the
students in the state. On and after August 5, 2009, the commission shall
select and designate
(II) One member who, at the time of designation, is a parent of a
student who is enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher education
in Colorado to represent the parents of students; AND
(III) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2026, ONE MEMBER WHO IS A CURRENT
MEMBER OF THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP AND WHO WORKS AT A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-106, amend
(5)(b), (6)(b), (9)(d)(II), and (11)(a)(III) as follows:
23-1-106. Duties and powers of the commission with respect to
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-078

capital construction and long-range planning - report - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(5) (b) The commission may except from the requirements for
program and physical planning any project that requires two FIVE million
dollars or less if the capital construction project is for new construction and
funded solely from cash funds held by the institution or the project is
funded through the higher education revenue bond intercept program
established pursuant to section 23-5-139, or ten million dollars or less if the
project is not for new construction and is funded solely from cash funds
held by the institution.
(6) (b) The commission shall review, at its next available meeting,
any two-year projection of capital construction projects submitted by a state
institution of higher education to be undertaken pursuant to subsection (9)
of this section and estimated to require total project expenditures exceeding
two FIVE million dollars if the capital construction project is for new
acquisitions of real property or new construction and funded solely from
cash funds held by the institution or the project is funded through the higher
education revenue bond intercept program established pursuant to section
23-5-139, or exceeding ten million dollars if the project is not for new
acquisitions of real property or new construction and is funded solely from
cash funds held by the institution. The projection must include the estimated
cost, the method of funding, and a schedule for project completion for each
project.
(9) (d) (II) A plan for a capital construction or capital renewal
project is not subject to review or approval by the commission if such
project is:
(A) Estimated to require total expenditures of two FIVE million
dollars or less if the capital construction project is for new acquisitions of
real property or for new construction and funded solely from cash funds
held by the institution or the project is funded through the higher education
revenue bond intercept program established pursuant to section 23-5-139;
or
(B) Estimated to require total expenditures of ten million dollars or
less if the project is not for new acquisitions of real property or for new
construction and is funded solely from cash funds held by the institution; OR
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-078

(C) FUNDED SOLELY FROM CASH FUNDS HELD BY THE INSTITUTION
THAT ARE NOT DERIVED FROM STUDENT FEES, SO LONG AS THE INSTITUTION
HAS NOT PARTICIPATED IN THE HIGHER EDUCATION REVENUE BOND
INTERCEPT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 23-5-139 FOR AT
LEAST THE PRECEDING FIVE YEARS.
(11) (a) Each state institution of higher education shall submit to the
commission on or before September 1 of each year a list and description of
each project for which an expenditure was made during the immediately
preceding fiscal year that:
(III) Was estimated to require total expenditures of two FIVE million
dollars or less if the capital construction project is for new acquisitions of
real property or for new construction and was funded solely from cash funds
held by the institution or the project was funded through the higher
education revenue bond intercept program established pursuant to section
23-5-139, or was estimated to require total expenditures of ten million
dollars or less if the project was not for new acquisitions of real property or
for new construction and was funded solely from cash funds held by the
institution; or
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-1-145 as
follows:
23-1-145. Department and commission directives - creation of
data advisory group - development of data policies - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS:
(I) A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 23-18-102 (10);
(II) A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-71-102
(1)(a);
(III) AN AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-60-103 (1); AND
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-078

(IV) A PARTICIPATING PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102 (7).
(b) (I) "STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA" MEANS
DATA, IN ANY FORMAT, PROVIDED BY AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
TO THE DEPARTMENT OR ANOTHER STATE AGENCY.
(II) "STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA" DOES NOT
INCLUDE NEW DATA POINTS CREATED THROUGH THE COMBINATION OF
INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA WITH OTHER STATE ADMINISTRATIVE
DATA OR PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(2) (a) THIS SUBSECTION (2) CODIFIES THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP
THAT EXISTS AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION AND THAT IS
FACILITATED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP SHALL
CONTINUE TO OPERATE TO SERVE IN AN ADVISORY CAPACITY TO THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION REGARDING DATA COLLECTION,
REPORTING, ACCESS, AND USE OF STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT
DATA.
(b) THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP CONSISTS OF REPRESENTATIVES
FROM INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT, AS
FOLLOWS:
(I) (A) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH GOVERNING BOARD OF A
STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(B) GOVERNING BOARDS THAT HAVE A SYSTEM COMPRISED OF MORE
THAN ONE CAMPUS MAY HAVE ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIVES FOR EACH
CAMPUS AND SYSTEM OFFICE;
(II) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE LOCAL DISTRICT
COLLEGES;
(III) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE AREA TECHNICAL
COLLEGES;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH PARTICIPATING PRIVATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102 (7);
AND
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-078

(V) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE DEPARTMENT.
(c) PARTICIPATION FROM EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
IN THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP IS VOLUNTARY.
(d) THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP IS ADVISORY ONLY AND DOES NOT
HAVE DECISION-MAKING OR BINDING AUTHORITY OVER THE DEPARTMENT OR
THE COMMISSION.
(3) (a) THE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE DATA ADVISORY
GROUP INCLUDE ADVISING ON:
(I) THE DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE OF POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES FOR THE COLLECTION, STORAGE, AND USE OF STATEWIDE
INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA;
(II) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF NEW DATA COLLECTION AND
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS RESULTING FROM LEGISLATION;
(III) THE SHARING OF STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT
DATA, EXCEPT THAT THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP SHALL ONLY ADVISE ON
THE SHARING OF STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA THAT IS
USED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR ITS STATUTORY DUTIES IF SUCH ADVICE IS
REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE COMMISSION;
(IV) LEGISLATION THAT AFFECTS INSTITUTIONAL DATA COLLECTION
AND REPORTING; AND
(V) THE DEVELOPMENT OF GUIDELINES FOR DATA AGGREGATION
AND SUPPRESSION WITHIN DATA PRIVACY LAWS AND INDUSTRY BEST
PRACTICES REGARDING PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION.
(4) (a) THE COMMISSION SHALL, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
APPROPRIATIONS, CONSULT WITH THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP TO ESTABLISH
POLICIES THAT:
(I) INCLUDE PROCEDURES FOR THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP TO
DEVELOP AND SUBMIT RECOMMENDATIONS;
(II) ARTICULATE HOW THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP WILL HAVE THE
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-078

DATA, REPORTING, AND INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PERFORM THEIR
ADVISORY ROLE;
(III) INCLUDE A PROCESS FOR SHARING AGGREGATED STATEWIDE
DATA DERIVED FROM STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA;
(IV) INCLUDE A PROCESS FOR SHARING DE-IDENTIFIED STATEWIDE
DATA DERIVED FROM STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA;
(V) INCLUDE PROCEDURES THAT ENSURE SUFFICIENT TIME TO
REVIEW DRAFT REPORTING AND SUPPORTING DATA THAT IS DERIVED FROM
STATEWIDE INSTITUTIONAL AND STUDENT DATA AND THAT IS RELATED TO
FUNDING OR RESOURCE ALLOCATION, LEGISLATIVE REPORTS, OR STRATEGIC
PLANNING; AND
(VI) ENSURE THAT ALL DATA AND REPORTING SHARED BETWEEN THE
DEPARTMENT, THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP, AND THE COMMISSION:
(A) SEEKS TO MAXIMIZE DATA TRANSPARENCY BETWEEN ENTITIES;
(B) SEEKS TO MINIMIZE THE TIME LAPSED BETWEEN DATA
SUBMISSIONS AND AVAILABILITY OF DATA AND REPORTING;
(C) INCLUDES DATA FROM ALL PARTICIPATING INSTITUTIONS;
(D) PROVIDES DETAIL BY INSTITUTION AND GOVERNING BOARD; AND
(E) IS SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW FOR VALIDATION BY INSTITUTIONAL
STAFF.
(b) THE COMMISSION RETAINS FINAL AUTHORITY OVER DATA POLICY
AND MAY PROVIDE REASONING OF FINAL DECISIONS TO THE DATA ADVISORY
GROUP.
(c) TO ACCOMPLISH ITS DUTIES, THE DATA ADVISORY GROUP SHALL
MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ANY ACTION REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION ON THE PART OF THE
DEPARTMENT OR THE COMMISSION IS SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-078

APPROPRIATIONS.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-20-129.5, amend
(2) as follows:
23-20-129.5. Enterprise auxiliary facility bonds.
(2) The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section shall MUST include but need not be limited to, the following
requirements:
(a) That, upon issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section
23-5-102, the university shall identify the primary revenue sources for
payment of principal and interest on the bonds from among those revenues
and other moneys MONEY pledged for payment of principal and interest on
the revenue bonds;
(b) That, upon issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section
23-5-102, the university shall perform a financial analysis based upon
assumptions approved by the board of regents and the state auditor, that
demonstrates that revenues expected to be annually available from the
sources identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION
(2)(a) OF THIS SECTION will be sufficient to pay at least one hundred
twenty-five percent of the annual principal and interest on the revenue
bonds; AND
(c) That the university shall annually review the revenue sources
identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION to determine if the financial analysis required in paragraph (b)
of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION shows sufficient
revenues for payment of principal and interest on the revenue bonds and, if
the revenues are not sufficient, take such action as the board of regents and
the state auditor shall require REQUIRES to assure that adequate revenues are
available to pay the principal and interest on the revenue bonds.
(d) That the maximum annual debt service on all revenue bonds
issued pursuant to section 23-5-102, except as provided for in sections
23-5-101.8 and 23-5-103, outstanding at any time for the university shall
not exceed ten percent of the university's unrestricted current fund
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-078

expenditures plus mandatory transfers;
(e) That the university shall establish and maintain such debt service
reserves and such reserves for repair and replacement of any auxiliary
facility or group of auxiliary facilities on behalf of which revenue bonds are
issued pursuant to section 23-5-102 and as may be required by the terms of
the resolution, indenture, or other document authorizing or executed in
connection with the issuance of the revenue bonds and subject to review
and approval by the state auditor; and
(f) That the university shall annually report to the state auditor
regarding compliance with the requirements specified in this subsection (2)
and any additional requirements that may be imposed by the board of
regents.
SECTION 10. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$48,098 is appropriated to the department of higher education for use by the
Colorado commission on higher education and higher education special
purpose programs. This appropriation is from the general fund and is based
on an assumption that the commission will require an additional 0.5 FTE.
To implement this act, the commission may use this appropriation for
administration.
SECTION 11. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Section 5 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1029 does
not become law, in which case section 5 takes effect upon passage.
(3) Section 6 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1029
becomes law, in which case section 6 takes effect upon passage or on the
effective date of House Bill 26-1029, whichever is later.
SECTION 12. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-078

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-078